North Carolina, session 2025, HB1188.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 20 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 15A-407. Limitations on immigration detention facilities.
(a) For the purposes of this section, the term "immigration detention facility" means any
facility located in this State that holds detainees for proceedings or removal from the United
States under the authority of the United States Department of Homeland Security, the United
States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or the United States Customs and Border
Protection.
(b) A city, county, or local or State law enforcement agency shall not enter into a contract
with the federal government or any federal agency or a private corporation, to house or detain in
a locked immigration detention facility noncitizens for purposes of civil immigration custody.
(c) A city, county, or local or State law enforcement agency shall not maintain a facility
that is specifically used to house or detain noncitizens for purposes of civil immigration custody.
(d) The Department of Public Safety (DPS) shall collect data from immigration detention
facilities and report findings to the General Assembly annually by May 1. The information
collected shall include all of the following information about detainees:
(1) Demographic information.
(2) Pending charges.
(3) Pending citizenship or asylum cases of the detainee.
(4) Location detained.
(5) Date released, if applicable.
(6) Date and location of deportation, if applicable."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Department of Public Safety the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for the administrative costs associated with implementing
this act.
SECTION 3. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are
severable.
*H1188-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective December 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1188-First Edition